Indiana, session 2026, HB1127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-10-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If the defendant in an eviction action
demonstrates to the court that the defendant qualifies for and has
applied to receive housing assistance from the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Indiana department of
veterans' affairs, the court shall stay the eviction action until the
earlier of the following:
(1) Forty-five (45) days after the order staying the eviction
action is issued.
(2) The housing assistance application has been processed and
either the housing assistance has been received by the
defendant or the application has been otherwise denied.
(b) Upon expiration of the stay described in subsection (a), the
court shall:
(1) dismiss the case;
(2) grant an additional stay in accordance with subsection (a);
2026 IN 1127—LS 6574/DI 151


or
(3) authorize the plaintiff to take action to further prosecute
the case;
based upon the facts of the case.
2026 IN 1127—LS 6574/DI 151